Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2207
Bonds; date; maturity; interest; redemption; sale.

The bonds shall be authorized by resolution or resolutions of the commission, bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration and conversion privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment and at such place or places within or without the state, and be subject to such terms of redemption and such redemption price or prices as such resolution or resolutions may provide. The bonds may be sold by the commission, at public or private sale, at such price or prices as the commission shall determine.

Laws 1969, c. 309, § 7, p. 1109;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 29.